Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Chapter 21

Judicial Organizations

16-21-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1943, ch. 130, § 1; 1945, ch. 89, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 738.1 (Williams, § 738.5); Acts 1967, ch. 132, § 1; 1973, ch. 65, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-901; Acts 1993, ch. 66, § 26; 1993, ch. 241, § 27; 1999, ch. 311, § 3; 2001, ch. 451, § 1; 2003, ch. 399, § 3; 2004, ch. 914, § 3a; 2013, ch. 236, § 32; 2019, ch. 345, § 23; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 13, effective May 21, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-21-101 concerned establishment — membership.

16-21-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1943, ch. 130, § 2; 1945, ch. 89, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 738.2 (Williams, § 738.6); Acts 1967, ch. 132, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-902; Acts 1993, ch. 66, § 27; 2003, ch. 399, § 4; 2013, ch. 236, § 48; 2019, ch. 345, § 24, repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 14, effective May 21, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-21-102 concerned terms of members.

16-21-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1943, ch. 130, § 2a, as added by Acts 1947, ch. 47, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 738.3 (Williams, § 738.6a); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-903; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 15, effective May 21, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-21-103 concerned elected members.

16-21-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1943, ch. 130, § 2a, as added by Acts 1947, ch. 47, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 738.3 (Williams, § 738.6b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-904; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 16, effective May 21, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-21-104 concerned vacancies in membership.

16-21-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 1943, ch. 130, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 738.4 (Williams, § 738.7); T.C.A., § 16-905; Acts 1989, ch. 154, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 65, § 3; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 17, effective May 21, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-21-105 concerned organization — assistants — expenses.

16-21-106. [Repealed.]

Acts 1943, ch. 130, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 738.5 (Williams, § 738.8); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-906; Acts 1982, ch. 751, § 1; 1994, ch. 686, § 1; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 18, effective May 21, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-21-106 concerned meetings.

16-21-107. [Repealed.]

Acts 1943, ch. 130, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 738.6 (Williams, § 738.9); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-907; Acts 1986, ch. 909, § 4; 1989, ch. 588, §§ 9, 10; 1990, ch. 751, § 4; 1990, ch. 1024, § 16; 1992, ch. 966, § 1; 1993, ch. 65, § 4; 1994, ch. 686, § 2; 1994, ch. 1005, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 326, § 1; 1999, ch. 311, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 408, §§ 6, 7; 2003, ch. 399, § 5; 2004, ch. 756, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 32; 2019, ch. 345, § 25; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 19, effective May 21, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-21-107 concerned duties of council.

16-21-108. [Repealed.]

Acts 1943, ch. 130, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 738.7 (Williams, § 738.10); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-908; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 20, effective May 21, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-21-108 concerned reports by judges and officials.

16-21-109. [Repealed.]

Acts 1943, ch. 130, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 738.8 (Williams, § 738.11); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-909; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 21, effective May 21, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-21-109 concerned expenses of members.

16-21-110. [Repealed.]

Acts 1943, ch. 130, §§ 5, 8; 1945, 89, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 738.6, 738.9 (Williams, §§ 738.9, 738.12); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-910; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 22, effective May 21, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-21-110 concerned appropriations.

16-21-111. Personal injury or death cases in chancery or circuit courts — Reports.

The clerks of circuit courts and the clerks and masters of chancery courts shall report, on a monthly basis, to the administrative office of the courts on a form to be devised and distributed by the administrative office of the courts, the following data:

The number of cases filed claiming money damages for personal injury or death;

The number of such cases actually proceeding to trial; and

For each such case actually proceeding to trial, the number of cases in which the plaintiff was awarded some money damages for personal injury or death, the amount of the verdict given in a jury case, the amount of judgment in a case without a jury, and any additur or remittitur awarded in the case by the trial judge.

The presiding judge in each circuit shall verify the trial data reported to the administrative office of the courts.

The administrative office of the courts shall compile such data and report the findings of the previous fiscal year, on or before February 1 of each year, to the chair of the senate judiciary committee, the chair of the judiciary committee of the house of representatives, and the attorney general and reporter. The report is a public document, available on request from the administrative office of the courts.

Acts 1989, ch. 53, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 32; 2019, ch. 345, § 26; 2019, ch. 420, § 23.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “the chair of the civil justice committee of the house of representatives” for “the chair of the judiciary committee of the house of representatives” in the first sentence of (c).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 345 substituted “judiciary” for “civil justice” following “chair of the” in the first sentence of (c).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 420 substituted “administrative office of the courts” for “Tennessee judicial council”, and “administrative office of the courts” for “judicial council” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 236, § 94. April 19, 2013.

Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 27. May 21, 2019.